Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-105.01
Unconstitutional.

This section enacted by 1963 Special Session as a part of Legislative Bill 11 was unconstitutional as special legislation. State Securities Co. v. Ley, 177 Neb. 251, 128 N.W.2d 766 (1964).